Hawaii statutes.
§428-108 Change of registered agent.
(a) A limited liability company or a foreign limited liability company may
change its registered agent by complying with the requirements of section 425R-7.

(b) If a registered agent changes its name,
its address or its type or jurisdiction of organization, the agent shall comply
with the requirements of section 425R-8 or 425R-9, whichever is applicable. [L
1996, c 92, pt of §1; am L 2002, c 130, §102; am L 2009, c 55, §53]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next